Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.070

Allocation among local governments of transferable development rights from agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance and designated rural zoned lands.

(1) The Puget Sound regional council must allocate among receiving cities the total number of development rights reported by eligible counties under RCW 39.108.060. Each receiving city allocated share must be determined by the Puget Sound regional council, in consultation with eligible counties and receiving cities, based on growth targets, determined by established growth management processes, and other relevant factors as determined by the Puget Sound regional council in conjunction with the counties and receiving cities.

(2) The Puget Sound regional council must report to each receiving city its receiving city allocated share on or before March 1, 2012.

(3) The Puget Sound regional council must report each receiving city allocated share to the department of commerce on or before March 1, 2012.

(4) A receiving city may become a sponsoring city by accepting all or a portion of its receiving city allocated share, adopting a plan in accordance with RCW 39.108.080, and creating one or more local infrastructure project areas to pay or finance costs of public improvements.

(5) A receiving city may, by interlocal agreement, transfer all or a portion of its receiving city allocated share to another sponsoring city. The transferred portion of the receiving city allocated share must be included in the other sponsoring city allocated share.

[ 2011 c 318 s 305.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.